Hawaii statutes.
§431:10B-102 Scope. All life insurance
and all accident and health or sickness insurance in connection with loans or
other credit transactions shall be subject to this article, except such
insurance in connection with a loan or other credit transaction of more than
ten years' duration; nor shall insurance be subject to this article where the
issuance of such insurance is an isolated transaction on the part of the
insurer not related to an agreement or a plan for insuring debtors of the
creditor. Nothing in this article shall be construed to relieve any person
from compliance with any other applicable law. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
2002, c 155, §67]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next